Washington statutes.
RCW 10.110.050

Civil liability.

The provisions of chapter 267, Laws of 2015 do not constitute a special relationship exception to the public duty doctrine. Officers and their employing departments and agencies and representatives are immune from civil liability arising out of the failure to comply with chapter 267, Laws of 2015, unless it is shown that, in the totality of the circumstances, the officer, employing department, agency, or representative acted with gross negligence or bad faith.

[ 2015 c 267 s 4.]